District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.81

Dissolution of corporation — Liquidation of business and affairs.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 214, ch. 269, § 81
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 589, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 168(c)(2)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.81.
1981 Ed., § 29-381.
1973 Ed., § 29-930e.